Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1420
Commission; membership; no disqualification to other public office or employment or forfeiture thereof.

Notwithstanding any provision of law, ordinance, or charter provision to the contrary, membership on the commission shall not disqualify any member from holding any other public office or employment, or cause the forfeiture thereof.

Laws 1969, c. 774, § 6, p. 2933.